District of Columbia statutes.
28:9-809

Priority.

Article 9 as amended by the 2012 Act determines the priority of conflicting claims to collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before the applicability date, Article 9 as it existed before the applicability date determines priority.

History

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-302, § 2(s), 60 DCR 2688

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-302: Section 4 of D.C. Law 19-302 provided that the act shall apply as of July 1, 2013.